extensions/1013418_russian-english-dictionary/russian_english_dictionary-1.1/dictionaries/Russian-English_Bilingual.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY '-.ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzÅàâäçèéêîïñóôöüЁАБВГДЕЖЗИЙКЛМНОПРСТУФХЦЧШЩЪЫЬЭЮЯабвгдежзийклмнопрстуфхцчшщъыьэюяё
FLAG NUMBER

PFX 1 Y 1
PFX 1 0 trans .

PFX 2 Y 5
PFX 2 0 com [bmp]
PFX 2 0 co [aeiouh]
PFX 2 0 cor r
PFX 2 0 col l
PFX 2 0 con [^abehilmopru].

PFX 3 Y 1
PFX 3   0     con         .

PFX 4 Y 4
PFX 4 0 il l
PFX 4 0 ir r
PFX 4 0 im [bmp]
PFX 4 0 in [^blmpr]

PFX 5 Y 1
PFX 5   0     in         .

PFX 6 Y 1
PFX 6 0 pre .

PFX 7 Y 1
PFX 7   0     pro         .

PFX 8 Y 1
PFX 8 0 un .

PFX 9 Y 1
PFX 9   0     un         .

PFX 10 Y 1
PFX 10 0 mis .

PFX 11 Y 49
PFX 11 0 псевдо .
PFX 11 0 ультра .
PFX 11 0 анти .
PFX 11 0 не .
PFX 11 0 без ^[и]
PFX 11 и безы [и]
PFX 11 0 небез ^[и]
PFX 11 и небезы [и]
PFX 11 0 пост .
PFX 11 0 пред .
PFX 11 0 противо .
PFX 11 0 микро .
PFX 11 0 полу .
PFX 11 0 контр .
PFX 11 0 сверх .
PFX 11 0 пере .
PFX 11 0 квази .
PFX 11 0 дез .
PFX 11 0 за .
PFX 11 0 само .
PFX 11 0 внутри .
PFX 11 0 супер .
PFX 11 0 поли .
PFX 11 0 много .
PFX 11 0 одно .
PFX 11 0 до .
PFX 11 0 пан .
PFX 11 0 пра .
PFX 11 0 архи .
PFX 11 0 де .
PFX 11 0 пара .
PFX 11 0 макро .
PFX 11 0 недо .
PFX 11 0 мета .
PFX 11 0 вне .
PFX 11 0 гипер .
PFX 11 0 разно .
PFX 11 0 экстра .
PFX 11 0 около .
PFX 11 0 мало .
PFX 11 0 низко .
PFX 11 0 дис .
PFX 11 0 бес .
PFX 11 0 мини .
PFX 11 0 гипо .
PFX 11 0 двух .
PFX 11 0 интер .
PFX 11 0 дву .
PFX 11 0 мульти .

PFX 12 Y 1
PFX 12 0 over .

PFX 13 Y 1
PFX 13 0 out .

PFX 14 Y 2
PFX 14 0 under [^r]
PFX 14 0 under- r

PFX 15 Y 49
PFX 15 0 псевдо .
PFX 15 0 ультра .
PFX 15 0 анти .
PFX 15 0 не .
PFX 15 0 без ^[и]
PFX 15 и безы [и]
PFX 15 0 небез ^[и]
PFX 15 и небезы [и]
PFX 15 0 пост .
PFX 15 0 пред .
PFX 15 0 противо .
PFX 15 0 микро .
PFX 15 0 полу .
PFX 15 0 контр .
PFX 15 0 сверх .
PFX 15 0 пере .
PFX 15 0 квази .
PFX 15 0 дез .
PFX 15 0 за .
PFX 15 0 само .
PFX 15 0 внутри .
PFX 15 0 супер .
PFX 15 0 поли .
PFX 15 0 много .
PFX 15 0 одно .
PFX 15 0 до .
PFX 15 0 пан .
PFX 15 0 пра .
PFX 15 0 архи .
PFX 15 0 де .
PFX 15 0 пара .
PFX 15 0 макро .
PFX 15 0 недо .
PFX 15 0 мета .
PFX 15 0 вне .
PFX 15 0 гипер .
PFX 15 0 разно .
PFX 15 0 экстра .
PFX 15 0 около .
PFX 15 0 мало .
PFX 15 0 низко .
PFX 15 0 дис .
PFX 15 0 бес .
PFX 15 0 мини .
PFX 15 0 гипо .
PFX 15 0 двух .
PFX 15 0 интер .
PFX 15 0 дву .
PFX 15 0 мульти .

PFX 16 Y 2
PFX 16 0 re [^e]
PFX 16 0 re- e

PFX 17 Y 1
PFX 17   0     re         .

PFX 18 Y 2
PFX 18 0 de [^e]
PFX 18 0 de- e

PFX 19 Y 1
PFX 19   0     de          .

PFX 20 Y 1
PFX 20 0 dis .

PFX 21 Y 49
PFX 21 0 псевдо .
PFX 21 0 ультра .
PFX 21 0 анти .
PFX 21 0 не .
PFX 21 0 без ^[и]
PFX 21 и безы [и]
PFX 21 0 небез ^[и]
PFX 21 и небезы [и]
PFX 21 0 пост .
PFX 21 0 пред .
PFX 21 0 противо .
PFX 21 0 микро .
PFX 21 0 полу .
PFX 21 0 контр .
PFX 21 0 сверх .
PFX 21 0 пере .
PFX 21 0 квази .
PFX 21 0 дез .
PFX 21 0 за .
PFX 21 0 само .
PFX 21 0 внутри .
PFX 21 0 супер .
PFX 21 0 поли .
PFX 21 0 много .
PFX 21 0 одно .
PFX 21 0 до .
PFX 21 0 пан .
PFX 21 0 пра .
PFX 21 0 архи .
PFX 21 0 де .
PFX 21 0 пара .
PFX 21 0 макро .
PFX 21 0 недо .
PFX 21 0 мета .
PFX 21 0 вне .
PFX 21 0 гипер .
PFX 21 0 разно .
PFX 21 0 экстра .
PFX 21 0 около .
PFX 21 0 мало .
PFX 21 0 низко .
PFX 21 0 дис .
PFX 21 0 бес .
PFX 21 0 мини .
PFX 21 0 гипо .
PFX 21 0 двух .
PFX 21 0 интер .
PFX 21 0 дву .
PFX 21 0 мульти .

PFX 22 Y 49
PFX 22 0 псевдо .
PFX 22 0 ультра .
PFX 22 0 анти .
PFX 22 0 не .
PFX 22 0 без ^[и]
PFX 22 и безы [и]
PFX 22 0 небез ^[и]
PFX 22 и небезы [и]
PFX 22 0 пост .
PFX 22 0 пред .
PFX 22 0 противо .
PFX 22 0 микро .
PFX 22 0 полу .
PFX 22 0 контр .
PFX 22 0 сверх .
PFX 22 0 пере .
PFX 22 0 квази .
PFX 22 0 дез .
PFX 22 0 за .
PFX 22 0 само .
PFX 22 0 внутри .
PFX 22 0 супер .
PFX 22 0 поли .
PFX 22 0 много .
PFX 22 0 одно .
PFX 22 0 до .
PFX 22 0 пан .
PFX 22 0 пра .
PFX 22 0 архи .
PFX 22 0 де .
PFX 22 0 пара .
PFX 22 0 макро .
PFX 22 0 недо .
PFX 22 0 мета .
PFX 22 0 вне .
PFX 22 0 гипер .
PFX 22 0 разно .
PFX 22 0 экстра .
PFX 22 0 около .
PFX 22 0 мало .
PFX 22 0 низко .
PFX 22 0 дис .
PFX 22 0 бес .
PFX 22 0 мини .
PFX 22 0 гипо .
PFX 22 0 двух .
PFX 22 0 интер .
PFX 22 0 дву .
PFX 22 0 мульти .

PFX 23 Y 1
PFX 23   0     dis         .

PFX 24 Y 1
PFX 24   0     re         .

PFX 25 Y 1
PFX 25   0     re         .

PFX 26 Y 1
PFX 26   0     de          .

PFX 27 Y 1
PFX 27   0     de          .

PFX 28 Y 1
PFX 28   0     dis         .

PFX 29 Y 1
PFX 29   0     dis         .

PFX 30 Y 1
PFX 30   0     con         .

PFX 31 Y 1
PFX 31   0     con         .

PFX 32 Y 1
PFX 32   0     in         .

PFX 33 Y 1
PFX 33   0     in         .

PFX 34 Y 1
PFX 34   0     pro         .

PFX 35 Y 1
PFX 35   0     pro         .

PFX 36 Y 1
PFX 36   0     un         .

PFX 37 Y 1
PFX 37   0     un         .

REP 121
REP е ё
REP ё e
REP тс ц
REP ц тс
REP н нн
REP нн н
REP л лл
REP лл л
REP тся ться
REP ться тся
REP йо ё
REP э е
REP a ei
REP ei a
REP a ey
REP ey a
REP ai ie
REP ie ai
REP alot a_lot
REP are air
REP are ear
REP are eir
REP air are
REP air ere
REP ere air
REP ere ear
REP ere eir
REP ear are
REP ear air
REP ear ere
REP eir are
REP eir ere
REP ch te
REP te ch
REP ch ti
REP ti ch
REP ch tu
REP tu ch
REP ch s
REP s ch
REP ch k
REP k ch
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP gh f
REP f gh
REP i igh
REP igh i
REP i uy
REP uy i
REP i ee
REP ee i
REP j di
REP di j
REP j gg
REP gg j
REP j ge
REP ge j
REP s ti
REP ti s
REP s ci
REP ci s
REP k cc
REP cc k
REP k qu
REP qu k
REP kw qu
REP o eau
REP eau o
REP o ew
REP ew o
REP oo ew
REP ew oo
REP ew ui
REP ui ew
REP oo ui
REP ui oo
REP ew u
REP u ew
REP oo u
REP u oo
REP u oe
REP oe u
REP u ieu
REP ieu u
REP ue ew
REP ew ue
REP uff ough
REP oo ieu
REP ieu oo
REP ier ear
REP ear ier
REP air ear
REP w qu
REP qu w
REP z ss
REP ss z
REP shun tion
REP shun sion
REP shun cion
REP size cise
REP f ugh
REP ff ugh
REP uf ough
REP dg j
REP j dg
REP w ugh
REP ness ity
REP leness ility
REP ness ivity
REP eness ity
REP og ogue
REP ck qu
REP ck que
REP eg e.g.
REP ie i.e.
REP t ght
REP ght t
REP ok OK
REP ts ce
REP ce ts

SFX 38 Y 32
SFX 38 ный ный .
SFX 38 ный ного .
SFX 38 ный ному .
SFX 38 ный ного .
SFX 38 ный ный .
SFX 38 ный ным .
SFX 38 ный ном .
SFX 38 ный ная .
SFX 38 ный ной .
SFX 38 ный ной .
SFX 38 ный ную .
SFX 38 ный ной .
SFX 38 ный ною .
SFX 38 ный ной .
SFX 38 ный ное .
SFX 38 ный ного .
SFX 38 ный ному .
SFX 38 ный ное .
SFX 38 ный ным .
SFX 38 ный ном .
SFX 38 ный ные .
SFX 38 ный ных .
SFX 38 ный ным .
SFX 38 ный ных .
SFX 38 ный ные .
SFX 38 ный ными .
SFX 38 ный ных .
SFX 38 ный ен .
SFX 38 ный на .
SFX 38 ный но .
SFX 38 ный ны .
SFX 38 ный 0 .

SFX 39 Y 32
SFX 39 ный ный .
SFX 39 ный ного .
SFX 39 ный ному .
SFX 39 ный ного .
SFX 39 ный ный .
SFX 39 ный ным .
SFX 39 ный ном .
SFX 39 ный ная .
SFX 39 ный ной .
SFX 39 ный ной .
SFX 39 ный ную .
SFX 39 ный ной .
SFX 39 ный ною .
SFX 39 ный ной .
SFX 39 ный ное .
SFX 39 ный ного .
SFX 39 ный ному .
SFX 39 ный ное .
SFX 39 ный ным .
SFX 39 ный ном .
SFX 39 ный ные .
SFX 39 ный ных .
SFX 39 ный ным .
SFX 39 ный ных .
SFX 39 ный ные .
SFX 39 ный ными .
SFX 39 ный ных .
SFX 39 ный ен .
SFX 39 ный на .
SFX 39 ный но .
SFX 39 ный ны .
SFX 39 ный 0 .

SFX 40 Y 13
SFX 40 0  .
SFX 40 0 а .
SFX 40 0 у .
SFX 40 0 а .
SFX 40 0 ом .
SFX 40 0 е .
SFX 40 0 и .
SFX 40 0 ов .
SFX 40 0 ам .
SFX 40 0 ов .
SFX 40 0 ами .
SFX 40 0 ах .
SFX 40 0 ою .

SFX 41 Y 13
SFX 41 0  .
SFX 41 0 а .
SFX 41 0 у .
SFX 41 0 а .
SFX 41 0 ом .
SFX 41 0 е .
SFX 41 0 и .
SFX 41 0 ов .
SFX 41 0 ам .
SFX 41 0 ов .
SFX 41 0 ами .
SFX 41 0 ах .
SFX 41 0 ою .

SFX 42 Y 70
SFX 42 оваться оваться .
SFX 42 оваться уюсь .
SFX 42 оваться уемся .
SFX 42 оваться уешься .
SFX 42 оваться уетесь .
SFX 42 оваться уется .
SFX 42 оваться уются .
SFX 42 оваться овался .
SFX 42 оваться овалась .
SFX 42 оваться овалось .
SFX 42 оваться овались .
SFX 42 оваться уясь .
SFX 42 оваться овавшись .
SFX 42 оваться уйся .
SFX 42 оваться уйтесь .
SFX 42 оваться ующийся .
SFX 42 оваться ующегося .
SFX 42 оваться ующемуся .
SFX 42 оваться ующегося .
SFX 42 оваться ующийся .
SFX 42 оваться ующимся .
SFX 42 оваться ующемся .
SFX 42 оваться ующаяся .
SFX 42 оваться ующейся .
SFX 42 оваться ующейся .
SFX 42 оваться ующуюся .
SFX 42 оваться ующейся .
SFX 42 оваться ующеюся .
SFX 42 оваться ующейся .
SFX 42 оваться ующееся .
SFX 42 оваться ующегося .
SFX 42 оваться ующемуся .
SFX 42 оваться ующееся .
SFX 42 оваться ующимся .
SFX 42 оваться ующемся .
SFX 42 оваться ующиеся .
SFX 42 оваться ующихся .
SFX 42 оваться ующимся .
SFX 42 оваться ующихся .
SFX 42 оваться ующиеся .
SFX 42 оваться ующимися .
SFX 42 оваться ующихся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшийся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшегося .
SFX 42 оваться овавшемуся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшегося .
SFX 42 оваться овавшийся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшимся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшемся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшаяся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшейся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшейся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшуюся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшейся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшеюся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшейся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшееся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшегося .
SFX 42 оваться овавшемуся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшееся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшимся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшемся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшиеся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшихся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшимся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшихся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшиеся .
SFX 42 оваться овавшимися .
SFX 42 оваться овавшихся .
SFX 42 оваться ивших .

SFX 43 Y 70
SFX 43 оваться оваться .
SFX 43 оваться уюсь .
SFX 43 оваться уемся .
SFX 43 оваться уешься .
SFX 43 оваться уетесь .
SFX 43 оваться уется .
SFX 43 оваться уются .
SFX 43 оваться овался .
SFX 43 оваться овалась .
SFX 43 оваться овалось .
SFX 43 оваться овались .
SFX 43 оваться уясь .
SFX 43 оваться овавшись .
SFX 43 оваться уйся .
SFX 43 оваться уйтесь .
SFX 43 оваться ующийся .
SFX 43 оваться ующегося .
SFX 43 оваться ующемуся .
SFX 43 оваться ующегося .
SFX 43 оваться ующийся .
SFX 43 оваться ующимся .
SFX 43 оваться ующемся .
SFX 43 оваться ующаяся .
SFX 43 оваться ующейся .
SFX 43 оваться ующейся .
SFX 43 оваться ующуюся .
SFX 43 оваться ующейся .
SFX 43 оваться ующеюся .
SFX 43 оваться ующейся .
SFX 43 оваться ующееся .
SFX 43 оваться ующегося .
SFX 43 оваться ующемуся .
SFX 43 оваться ующееся .
SFX 43 оваться ующимся .
SFX 43 оваться ующемся .
SFX 43 оваться ующиеся .
SFX 43 оваться ующихся .
SFX 43 оваться ующимся .
SFX 43 оваться ующихся .
SFX 43 оваться ующиеся .
SFX 43 оваться ующимися .
SFX 43 оваться ующихся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшийся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшегося .
SFX 43 оваться овавшемуся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшегося .
SFX 43 оваться овавшийся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшимся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшемся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшаяся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшейся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшейся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшуюся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшейся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшеюся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшейся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшееся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшегося .
SFX 43 оваться овавшемуся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшееся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшимся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшемся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшиеся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшихся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшимся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшихся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшиеся .
SFX 43 оваться овавшимися .
SFX 43 оваться овавшихся .
SFX 43 оваться ивших .

SFX 44 Y 12
SFX 44 0 l a
SFX 44 e al [^bcgv]e
SFX 44 e ial [bcgv]e
SFX 44 0 ial [bcrx]
SFX 44 um al um
SFX 44 0 al [^u]m
SFX 44 y al ty
SFX 44 y ial [^t]y
SFX 44 0 ual [px]t
SFX 44 0 tal [iu]t
SFX 44 0 al [^ipux]t
SFX 44 0 al [^aebcrtxmy]

SFX 45 Y 13
SFX 45 ок ок .
SFX 45 ок ка .
SFX 45 ок ку .
SFX 45 ок ок .
SFX 45 ок ком .
SFX 45 ок ке .
SFX 45 ок ки .
SFX 45 ок ков .
SFX 45 ок кам .
SFX 45 ок ки .
SFX 45 ок ками .
SFX 45 ок ках .
SFX 45 ок овавшись .

SFX 46 Y 13
SFX 46 ок ок .
SFX 46 ок ка .
SFX 46 ок ку .
SFX 46 ок ок .
SFX 46 ок ком .
SFX 46 ок ке .
SFX 46 ок ки .
SFX 46 ок ков .
SFX 46 ок кам .
SFX 46 ок ки .
SFX 46 ок ками .
SFX 46 ок ках .
SFX 46 ок овавшись .
